testing/myv-tests-N-psaka-1.yaml
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзодонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзодонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзосонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзосонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзостонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзостонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзовантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзовантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзовтомонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзовтомонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзошкантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзошкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотненьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнескак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнескак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотневаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотневаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотневгак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотневгак
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотненеккак
    псака+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псаканзотненеккак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзодояк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзодояк
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзодояк
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзодояк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзокскак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзокскак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзокскак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзокскак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзоськак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзоськак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзодонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзодонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзосонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзосонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзостонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзостонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзовантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзовантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзовтомонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзовтомонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзошкантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзошкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотненьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнескак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнескак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотневаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотневаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотневгак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотневгак
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотненеккак
    псака+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакавтомонзотненеккак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодояк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодояк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодояк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодояк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзокскак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзокскак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзокскак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзокскак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзоськак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзоськак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзосонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзосонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзостонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзостонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзовантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзовантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзовтомонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзовтомонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзошкантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзошкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотненьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнескак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнескак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотненеккак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотненеккак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодояк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодояк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодояк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодояк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзокскак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзокскак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзокскак
